Massachusetts, session 194th, S3134.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “county”, in line 264, the 
following words:- ; employees of a city or town who are employed as a building inspector, 
plumbing inspector, or certified building code enforcement official.  
SECTION 2. Chapter 143 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 99 the following section:- 
Section 99A. The board shall develop regulations to increase standards that address 
safety issues in the construction industry. Said regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the 
following requirements: 
(i) skilled workers that specialize in a particular trade shall receive 40 hours of safety 
training by an approved training provider, with an annual 10-hour continued education 
component; 

of 3 13  (ii) craft forepersons shall receive 62 hours of safety training by an approved training 
provider, with an annual 10-hour continued education component; 
(iii) for any project over 50,000 square feet, a site safety manager shall be on-site at all 
times in which work is taking place; 
(iv) site safety managers shall meet the following requirements: 
(A) not less than 5 years’ construction safety experience; 
(B) 40 hours of completed site safety manager course; 
(C) successful completion of a safety experience background check; 
(D) successful completion of a test, to be designed by the board; provided, however, that 
site safety managers must score not less than 80 per cent on said test; 
(E) physical exam for fitness; and 
(F) annual 3-year continued education; 
(v) concrete, steel, excavation and façade workers shall receive 62-hours of safety 
training by an approved training provider, with an annual 10-hour continued education 
requirement; 
(vi) major building and demolition projects not less than 50,000 square feet shall prepare 
and keep current a site safety plan, which shall be reviewed and approved by the appropriate 
state or local official and shall be on site for review by an inspector; 

of 3 31  (vii) minimum requirements for the design, permitting, erection, maintenance and 
disassembly of supported and suspended scaffolds, which shall include stamped and filed 
drawings by a licensed design professional, use of a licensed master rigger for erection and 
dismantling of suspended scaffolds, worker training, debris netting and scaffold access; 
(viii) minimum standards for the design, erection and inspection of concrete formwork, 
which shall include: (A) site specific drawings to be prepared by registered design professional; 
and (B) engineered designs submitted for review and approval and maintained on site for 
inspectors; 
(ix) minimum requirements for perimeter protection prior to façade installation, which 
shall include permitted drawing by licensed design professional and vertical and horizontal 
safety netting to be installed and maintained at all unenclosed perimeters; and 
(x) minimum standards for the design, permitting, erection, inspection and maintenance 
of sidewalk sheds, including adjoining property protection, and mandatory sidewalk sheds and 
site scaffolding for all projects.